New York, session 2025-2026, A8161.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 455 of the laws of 2011 amending the 2 environmental conservation law relating to authorizing angling by a 3 single individual with up to three lines in freshwater, as amended by 4 chapter 419 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed December 31, [2025] 2027. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02347-01-5